Vermont, session 2025-2026, H667.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 2472 is amended to read:
§ 2472. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT
(a) The Department of Housing and Community Development is created
within the Agency of Commerce and Community Development. The
Department shall:
* * *
VT LEG #386192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.667
2026 Page 2 of 2
(6) Provide information and resources to the public on effective methods
of establishing collective homeownership. Resources shall include materials
and guides for organization, governance, and conflict resolution of collective
homeownership models, standard template articles of incorporation to establish
a cooperative housing corporation under 11 V.S.A. chapter 14, and template
agreements for establishing a tenants-in-common homeownership
arrangement. Resources shall be made available online in a user-friendly
format and at no cost to the public.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386192 v.1